Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 1
Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act

§ 15-14-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act.”

§ 15-14-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Account” means an arrangement under a terms of service agreement in which a custodian carries, maintains, processes, receives or stores a digital asset of the user or provides goods or services to the user.

“Agent” means an attorney in fact granted authority under a durable or nondurable power of attorney.

“Carries” means engages in the transmission of an electronic communication.

“Catalog of electronic communications” means information that identifies each person with which a user has had an electronic communication, the time and date of the communication and the electronic address of the person.

“Conservator” means a person appointed by a court to manage the estate of a living individual. The term includes a limited conservator.

“Content of an electronic communication” means information concerning the substance or meaning of the communication that:

Has been sent or received by a user;

Is in electronic storage by a custodian providing an electronic communication service to the public or is carried or maintained by a custodian providing a remote computing service to the public; and

Is not readily accessible to the public.

“Court” means the court in this state having jurisdiction in matters relating to the content of this chapter.

“Custodian” means a person that carries, maintains, processes, receives or stores a digital asset of a user.

“Designated recipient” means a person chosen by a user using an online tool to administer digital assets of the user.

“Digital asset” means an electronic record in which an individual has a right or interest. The term does not include an underlying asset or liability unless the asset or liability is itself an electronic record.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.

“Electronic communication” has the meaning set forth in 18 U.S.C. 2510(12).

“Electronic communication service” means a custodian that provides to a user the ability to send or receive an electronic communication.

“Fiduciary” means an original, additional or successor personal representative, conservator, agent or trustee.

“Information” means data, text, images, videos, sounds, codes, computer programs, software, databases or the like.

“Online tool” means an electronic service provided by a custodian that allows the user, in an agreement distinct from the terms-of-service agreement between the custodian and user, to provide directions for disclosure or nondisclosure of digital assets to a third person.

“Person” means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, or other legal entity.
(18) “Personal representative” means an executor, administrator, special administrator or person that performs substantially the same function under the law of this state other than this chapter.

(19) “Power of attorney” means a record that grants an agent authority to act in the place of a principal.

(20) “Principal” means an individual who grants authority to an agent in a power of attorney.

(21) “Protected person” means an individual for whom a conservator has been appointed. The term includes an individual for whom an application for the appointment of a conservator is pending.

(22) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(23) “Remote computing service” means a custodian that provides to a user computer processing services or the storage of digital assets by means of an electronic communications system, as defined in 18 U.S.C. 2510(14).

(24) “Terms of service agreement” means an agreement that controls the relationship between a user and a custodian.

(25) “Trustee” means a fiduciary with legal title to property under an agreement or declaration that creates a beneficial interest in another. The term includes a successor trustee.

(26) “User” means a person that has an account with a custodian.

(27) “Will” includes a codicil, testamentary instrument that only appoints an executor and instrument that revokes or revises a testamentary instrument.

§ 15-14-103. Applicability.

This chapter applies to:

A fiduciary acting under a will or power of attorney executed before, on or after July 1, 2016;

A personal representative acting for a decedent who died before, on or after July 1, 2016;

A conservatorship proceeding commenced before, on or after July 1, 2016; and

A trustee acting under a trust created before, on or after July 1, 2016.

This chapter applies to a custodian if the user resides in this state or resided in this state at the time of the user’s death.

This chapter does not apply to a digital asset of an employer used by an employee in the ordinary course of the employer’s business.

§ 15-14-104. User direction for disclosure of digital assets.

A user may use an online tool to direct the custodian to disclose to the designated recipient or not to disclose some or all of the user’s digital assets, including the content of electronic communications. If the online tool allows the user to modify or delete a direction at all times, a direction regarding disclosure using an online tool overrides a contrary direction by the user in a will, trust, power of attorney or other record.

If a user has not used an online tool to give direction under subsection (1) of this section or if the custodian has not provided an online tool, the user may allow or prohibit in a will, trust, power of attorney or other record, the disclosure to a fiduciary of some or all of the user’s digital assets, including the content of electronic communications sent or received by the user.

A user’s direction under subsection (1) or (2) of this section overrides a contrary provision in a terms of service agreement that does not require the user to act affirmatively and distinctly from the user’s assent to the terms of service.

§ 15-14-105. Terms of service agreement.

This chapter does not change or impair a right of a custodian or a user under a terms of service agreement to access and use digital assets of the user.

This chapter does not give a fiduciary or designated recipient any new or expanded rights other than those held by the user for whom, or for whose estate, the fiduciary or designated recipient acts or represents.

A fiduciary’s or designated recipient’s access to digital assets may be modified or eliminated by a user, by federal law or by a terms of service agreement if the user has not provided direction under section 15-14-104, Idaho Code.

§ 15-14-106. Procedure for disclosing digital assets.

When disclosing the digital assets of a user under this chapter, the custodian may at its sole discretion:

Grant a fiduciary or designated recipient full access to the user’s account;

Grant a fiduciary or designated recipient partial access to the user’s account sufficient to perform the tasks with which the fiduciary or designated recipient is charged; or

Provide a fiduciary or designated recipient with a copy in a record of any digital asset that, on the date the custodian received the request for disclosure, the user could have accessed if the user were alive and had full capacity and access to the account.

A custodian may assess a reasonable administrative charge for the cost of disclosing digital assets under this chapter.

A custodian need not disclose a digital asset deleted by a user.

If a user directs or a fiduciary requests a custodian to disclose some, but not all, of the user’s digital assets, the custodian need not disclose the assets if segregation of the assets would impose an undue burden on the custodian. If the custodian believes the direction or request imposes an undue burden, the custodian or the fiduciary may seek an order from the court for an order to disclose:

A subset limited by date of the user’s digital assets;

All of the user’s digital assets to the fiduciary or designated recipient;

None of the user’s digital assets; or

All of the user’s digital assets to the court for review in camera.

§ 15-14-107. Disclosure of the content of electronic communications of deceased user.

If a deceased user consented or a court directs disclosure of the contents of electronic communications of the user, the custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the estate of the user the content of an electronic communication sent or received by the user if the personal representative gives the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the death certificate of the user;

A certified copy of the letter of appointment of the personal representative or a small estate affidavit or court order;

Unless the user provided direction using an online tool, a copy of the user’s will, trust, power of attorney or other record evidencing the user’s consent to disclosure of the content of electronic communications; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, user name, address or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account;

Evidence linking the account to the user; or

A finding by the court that:

The user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection; or

Disclosure of the content of electronic communications of the user would not violate 18 U.S.C. 2701 et seq., 47 U.S.C. 222, or other applicable law;

Unless the user provided direction using an online tool, the user consented to disclosure of the content of electronic communications; or

Disclosure of the content of electronic communications of the user is reasonably necessary for the administration of the estate.

§ 15-14-108. Disclosure of other digital assets of deceased user.

Unless the user prohibited disclosure of digital assets or the court directs otherwise, a custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the estate of a deceased user a catalog of electronic communications sent or received by the user and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, of the user, if the personal representative gives to the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the death certificate of the user;

A certified copy of the letter of appointment of the representative or a small estate affidavit or court order; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, user name, address or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account;

Evidence linking the account to the user;

An affidavit stating that disclosure of the user’s digital assets is reasonably necessary for the administration of the estate; or

A finding by the court that:

The user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection; or

Disclosure of the user’s digital assets is reasonably necessary for the administration of the estate.

§ 15-14-109. Disclosure of content of electronic communications of principal.

To the extent a power of attorney expressly grants an agent authority over the content of electronic communications sent or received by the principal and unless directed otherwise by the principal or the court, a custodian shall disclose to the agent the content of an electronic communication sent or received by the principal if the agent gives to the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

An original or copy of the power of attorney expressly granting the agent authority over the content of electronic communications of the principal;

A certification by the agent, under penalty of perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, user name, address or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the principal’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the principal.

§ 15-14-110. Disclosure of other digital assets of principal.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the principal or provided by a power of attorney, a custodian shall disclose to an agent with specific authority over digital assets or general authority to act on behalf of the principal a catalog of electronic communications sent or received by the principal and digital assets of the principal, other than the content of electronic communications, if the agent gives to the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

An original or a copy of the power of attorney that gives the agent specific authority over digital assets or general authority to act on behalf of the principal;

A certification by the agent, under penalty of perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, user name, address or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the principal’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the principal.

§ 15-14-111. Disclosure of digital assets held in trust when trustee is original user.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is an original user of an account any digital asset of the account held in trust, including any catalog of electronic communications of the trustee and the content of electronic communications.

§ 15-14-112. Disclosure of contents of electronic communications held in trust when trustee is not original user.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the user or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is not an original user of the account the content of an electronic communication sent or received by an original or successor user and carried, maintained, processed, received or stored by the custodian in the account of the trust if the trustee gives to the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the trust instrument or a certification of the trust under chapter 1, title 68, Idaho Code, that includes consent to disclosure of the content of electronic communications to the trustee;

A certification by the trustee, under penalty of perjury, that the trust exists and that the trustee is a currently acting trustee of the trust; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, user name, address or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the trust’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the trust.

§ 15-14-113. Disclosure of other digital assets held in trust when trustee is not original user.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the user, or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is not an original user of an account a catalog of electronic communications sent or received by an original or successor user and stored, carried or maintained by the custodian in an account of the trust and any digital assets in which the trust has a right or interest, other than the content of electronic communications, if the trustee gives to the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the trust instrument or a certification of the trust under chapter 1, title 68, Idaho Code;

A certification by the trustee, under penalty of perjury, that the trust exists and that the trustee is a currently acting trustee of the trust; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, user name, address or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the trust’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the trust.

§ 15-14-114. Disclosure of digital assets to conservator of protected person.

The court, after an opportunity for a hearing under part 4, chapter 5, title 15, Idaho Code, may grant a conservator the right to access a protected person’s digital assets.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court or directed by the user, a custodian shall disclose to a conservator the catalog of electronic communications sent or received by the protected person and any digital assets in which the protected person has a right or interest, other than the content of electronic communications, if the conservator gives to the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the court order that gives the conservator authority over the protected person’s digital assets; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, user name, address or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the protected person’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the protected person.

A conservator with general authority to manage the assets of a protected person may request a custodian of the protected person’s digital assets to suspend or terminate an account of the protected person for good cause. A request made under this section must be accompanied by a certified copy of the court order giving the conservator authority over the protected person’s property.

§ 15-14-115. Fiduciary duty and authority.

The legal duties imposed on a fiduciary charged with managing tangible personal property apply to the management of digital assets, including:

The duty of care;

The duty of loyalty; and

The duty of confidentiality.

A fiduciary’s or designated recipient’s authority with respect to a digital asset of a user:

Is subject to the applicable terms of service agreement governing the account, except as otherwise provided in section 15-14-104, Idaho Code;

Is subject to other applicable laws, including copyright law;

In the case of a fiduciary, is limited by the scope of the fiduciary’s duties; and

May not be used to impersonate the user.

A fiduciary with authority over the property of a decedent, protected person, principal or settlor has the right to access any digital asset in which the decedent, protected person, principal or settlor had a right or interest and that is not held by a custodian or subject to a terms of service agreement.

A fiduciary acting within the scope of the fiduciary’s duties is an authorized user of the property of the decedent, protected person, principal or settlor for the purpose of applicable computer fraud and unauthorized computer access laws, including section 18-2202, Idaho Code.

A fiduciary with authority over the tangible personal property of a decedent, protected person, principal or settlor:

Has the right to access the property and any digital asset stored in it; and

Is an authorized user for the purpose of computer fraud and unauthorized computer access laws, including section 18-2202, Idaho Code.

A custodian may disclose information in an account to a fiduciary of the user when the information is required to terminate an account used to access digital assets licensed to the user.

A fiduciary of a user may request a custodian to terminate the user’s account. A request for account termination must be in writing, in either physical or electronic form, and accompanied by:

If the user is deceased, a certified copy of the death certificate of the user;

A certified copy of the letter of appointment of the personal representative or a small estate affidavit, court order, power of attorney or trust giving the fiduciary authority over the account; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, user name, address or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account;

Evidence linking the account to the user; or

An order of the court finding that the user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.

§ 15-14-116. Custodian compliance and immunity.

Not later than sixty (60) days after receipt of the information required under sections 15-14-107 through 15-14-115, Idaho Code, a custodian shall comply with a request under this chapter from a fiduciary or designated recipient to disclose digital assets or to terminate an account. If the custodian fails to comply, the fiduciary or designated recipient may apply to the court for an order directing compliance.

An order directing compliance must contain a finding that compliance is not in violation of 18 U.S.C. 2702.

A custodian may notify the user that a request for disclosure of digital assets or account termination was made pursuant to this chapter.

A custodian may deny a request under this chapter from a fiduciary or designated recipient for disclosure of digital assets or account termination if the custodian is aware of any lawful access to the account following the receipt of the fiduciary’s request.

This chapter does not limit a custodian’s ability to obtain or to require a fiduciary or designated recipient requesting disclosure or termination to obtain a court order which:

Specifies that an account belongs to the protected person or principal;

Specifies that there is sufficient consent from the protected person or principal to support the requested disclosure; and

Contains a finding required by any other applicable law.

A custodian and its officers, employees and agents are immune from liability for an act or omission done reasonably and in good faith compliance with this chapter.

§ 15-14-117. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

§ 15-14-118. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits or supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

§ 15-14-119. Severability.

If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.